Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 10 Employees of Certain State Authorities and Commissions

47-2-310.
Merit system of personnel administration for employees of Georgia Federal-State Shipping Point Inspection Service; membership in retirement system; contributions; creditable service.

The Georgia Federal-State Shipping Point Inspection Service, hereinafter referred to as the “inspection service” in this Code section, is declared to be an adjunct of the Georgia Department of Agriculture, such inspection service assisting in the agricultural products inspection duties of that department. All employees of the inspection service shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration established by the agencies which are parties to a cooperative agreement between the Consumer and Marketing Service of the United States Department of Agriculture and the Georgia Department of Agriculture. All employees shall perform services on the basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency. The establishment of this merit system prior to July 1, 1975, shall be a prerequisite to coverage of the inspection service under the retirement system.

Any person employed by the inspection service on July 1, 1975, is authorized to become a member of Division A of the retirement system. Any person first employed or reemployed by the inspection service after July 1, 1975, shall, as a condition of employment, become a member of Division A of the retirement system. In order to become or be required to be a member of the retirement system, an employee of the inspection service must be employed in this state in a position normally requiring actual performance of duty during not less than nine months of the year.

The Georgia Department of Agriculture shall be responsible for making certain that the administrative officials of the inspection service shall deduct or collect from each member the employee contributions required by the retirement system and remit them to the retirement system as required by law or regulations. The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated for the operation of the Georgia Department of Agriculture the employer contributions required by the retirement system or by regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. Such employer contributions shall be paid by the Commissioner upon receipt of an invoice from the retirement system.

Any person who becomes a member of the retirement system under this Code section, upon certified proof of previous service with the inspection service, shall be eligible to receive up to five years of credit for such previous service by paying the regular employer and employee contributions, including accrued interest, that would have accumulated during such period of employment. In the computation of such contributions and interest, the compensation of such member shall be deemed to have been the same as the compensation such member received on the date he first became a member. For any member claiming creditable service under this subsection on and after July 1, 1983, the board of trustees shall calculate the period of time the contributions and interest provided for above will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system; and the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled. The inspection service shall be authorized to supplement contributions and interest provided for above in an amount, as determined by the board of trustees, which, together with such contributions and interest, will fully fund as creditable service the total amount of previous service claimed without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system, and in the event such supplement is paid by the inspection service to the board of trustees, the member shall be entitled to receive all such previous service as creditable service up to the maximum of five years. Credit for previous service shall be available to a member only after he has worked for the inspection service for one full year following July 1, 1975, and must be exercised, if at all, within one year after the time any such member becomes eligible to elect such option or by not later than January 1, 1984, whichever date is later.

The board of trustees is authorized to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the implementation of this Code section, including, but not limited to, regulations and rules dealing with any required reports of employment and remission of contributions by the administrative officials of the inspection service and the method for certification of proof of previous service with the inspection service.

Any member who was a member of the retirement system prior to July 1, 1975, and who, prior to becoming a member of the retirement system, was employed by the inspection service shall be eligible to receive up to five years of creditable service under the retirement system for service rendered as an employee of the inspection service prior to becoming a member of the retirement system. In order to receive such creditable service, the member must pay to the board of trustees the employer and employee contributions which would have been paid to the retirement system during the period, not to exceed five years, of employment by the inspection service as if such employment had been rendered while a member of the retirement system, plus interest at the rate of 7 percent on such employer and employee contributions compounded annually from the time of the employment with the inspection service to the date of payment. The board of trustees may require such documentation as the board finds necessary to verify the period of employment with the inspection service and the compensation received for such employment. The board of trustees shall calculate the amount of payment required to obtain creditable service under this Code section and shall certify such amount to a member who applies for creditable service under this subsection. No more than a total of five years of service prior to July 1, 1975, as an employee of the inspection service may be obtained as creditable service under all provisions of this Code section. No creditable service may be obtained pursuant to the provisions of this subsection for any period for which creditable service has been or may be obtained under any other provision of this chapter.

Any member who was employed by the inspection service on July 1, 1975, and who was a member on that date shall be eligible to receive up to five years of creditable service under the retirement system for service rendered as an employee of the inspection service prior to becoming a member of the retirement system. Such service shall be in addition to the creditable service authorized by subsection (f) of this Code section. In order to receive such creditable service, the member must pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions of 5 percent of his or her salary on July 1, 1975, for each month of creditable service, together with interest at the rate of 4 percent compounded annually from July 1, 1975, to the date of payment. The board of trustees may require such documentation as the board finds necessary to verify the period of employment with the inspection service and the compensation received for such employment. The board of trustees shall calculate the amount of payment required to obtain creditable service under this Code section and shall certify such amount to a member who applies for creditable service under this paragraph.

The inspection service is authorized to supplement, if necessary, the payment made to the board of trustees pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection from funds available to the inspection service.

Payments made pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall be made not later than January 1, 1997. The board shall determine whether the amount of creditable service purchased by the total contributions made pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection would warrant, without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system, up to five years of creditable service.

No creditable service may be obtained pursuant to the provisions of this subsection for any period for which creditable service has been or may be obtained under any other provision of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1494, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 784, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 556, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 299, § 1.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-2-311.
[Reserved] Credit for service by persons formerly employed by the Georgia Warm Springs Foundation; payments required in order to obtain credit.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 35, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1974, p. 130, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-312.
Merit system of personnel administration for employees of Georgia agricultural commodity commissions; membership in the retirement system; contributions; creditable service for prior employment.

The Georgia agricultural commodity commissions are declared to be adjuncts of the Georgia Department of Agriculture, such commissions providing for the promotion of the production, marketing, sales, uses and utilization, processing, and improvement of the agricultural products of this state and producers connected therewith. All employees of any of the agricultural commodity commissions set forth in Code Section 2-8-5 shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration established by the commissions, pursuant to which such employees shall be employed. All employees shall perform services on the basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency. The establishment of this merit system prior to July 1, 1976, shall be a prerequisite to coverage of the commissions under the retirement system.

Persons employed by any of the agricultural commodity commissions on July 1, 1976, may elect to become members of Division A of the retirement system; but persons entering or reentering into employment with any of the agricultural commodity commissions after July 1, 1976, shall, as a condition of employment, become members of Division A of the retirement system, provided that no person so employed shall become a member unless his position normally requires actual performance of duty during not less than nine months of the year. The commencement date for the inclusion of employees of any of the agricultural commodity commissions within the retirement system shall be July 1, 1976.

The Georgia Department of Agriculture shall ensure that the employees’ contributions required under this chapter are deducted and collected from each member and remitted to the retirement system; and the Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized and directed to take any necessary action to ensure that the employer contributions under this chapter are paid from the funds of the agricultural commodity commissions. Such employer contributions shall be paid by the Commissioner to the retirement system upon receipt of an invoice from the retirement system.

The board of trustees is authorized to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the implementation of this Code section, including, but not limited to, regulations and rules dealing with any required reports of employment and remission of contributions by the administrative officials of the agricultural commodity commissions.

This subsection shall apply only to an employee of an agricultural commodity commission employed on July 1, 1976.

An employee of an agricultural commodity commission who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for prior employment as an employee of such commission, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Any such employee must pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions, plus accrued interest thereon at the rate of 5 percent per annum, compounded annually, which would have been paid during the period of prior employment if the employee had been a member of the retirement system during such period. The commission shall pay from any funds available to the commission the employer contributions, plus accrued interest thereon at the rate of 5 percent per annum, compounded annually, which would have been paid during such period of prior employment. For a member claiming creditable service for prior employment under this subsection, the board of trustees shall determine the period of time that the payments to the board of trustees provided for under this subsection will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled.

The authority shall be authorized to supplement, if necessary, the payments made to the board of trustees under paragraph (2) of this subsection all or any part of the amount which the board of trustees determines will fully fund as creditable service the total amount of prior employment of the employee without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. If such supplement is paid to the board of trustees by the commission, the employee shall receive such creditable service under the retirement system for prior employment as an employee of the commission as the amount so paid will fund without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 481, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 339, § 1.

47-2-313.
Merit system of personnel administration for officers and employees of Jekyll Island—State Park Authority; membership in retirement system; creditable service; contributions.

All eligible officers and employees of the Jekyll Island—State Park Authority shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration as promulgated by that authority and under which all such officers and employees shall be selected on a basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency. All such officers and employees, except as otherwise provided in this Code section, are authorized to become members of the retirement system, provided that such membership shall become effective no earlier than April 1, 1958; provided, further, that any officer or employee of the authority who is already a member of the retirement system shall be entitled to credit for his total service with the authority. All specially classified maintenance and food service employees of the authority hired on or after July 1, 1987, and paid on an hourly basis shall not be members of the retirement system and shall not be included under the health insurance plan for state employees as provided for in Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45. There shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the operation of the Jekyll Island—State Park Authority all contributions required by this chapter. All such payments shall be in addition to the regular compensation allowed to such officers and employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 119, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1035, § 2.

47-2-314.
Membership in the retirement system of officers and employees of the Geo. L. Smith II Georgia World Congress Center Authority; creditable service; contributions.

All officers and employees of the Geo. L. Smith II Georgia World Congress Center Authority, established by Code Section 10-9-3, who are not already members of the retirement system may elect to become members on or after April 1, 1977. Any officer or employee of the authority who is already a member of the retirement system by virtue of services with another employer shall be entitled to credit for his services and shall not suffer any loss of such credit to which he is otherwise entitled. There shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available for the operation of the Geo. L. Smith II Georgia World Congress Center Authority all employer contributions required under this chapter, including employer social security contributions. The commencement date shall be April 1, 1977.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 670, § 2.

47-2-315.
Merit system of personnel administration for officers and employees of the Georgia Building Authority; membership in the retirement system; contributions.

All eligible officers and employees of the Georgia Building Authority shall be subject to a merit system of personnel administration as promulgated by the Georgia Building Authority under which all such officers and employees shall be selected on a basis of merit, fitness, and efficiency. All such officers and employees are authorized to become members of the retirement system. There shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the operation of the Georgia Building Authority all contributions required by the retirement system. All such payments shall be in addition to the regular compensation allowed to such officers and employees, provided that membership shall not become effective before March 1, 1956.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 277, § 1.

47-2-316.
Membership in the retirement system of officers or employees of Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority.

As used in this Code section, the term “Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority” or “authority” means the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority established by Chapter 3 of Title 2, known as the “Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority Act.”

Effective on July 1, 1988, or on first becoming officers or employees of the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority, all such officers and employees shall become members of the retirement system. Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 1988, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 1988, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated or otherwise available for the operation of the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-316

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 201, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 794, § 1/HB 944.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 1, 2012, substituted “established by Chapter 3 of Title 2” for “established by Part 8 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 12” in subsection (a).

47-2-317.
[Reserved] Membership in the retirement system of officers and employees of the Georgia Agrirama Development Authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 264, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 332, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 440, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 504, § 1(1)/HB 144, effective May 11, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

For present comparable provisions on retirement provisions for employees transferred to the Board of Regents, see Code Sections 47-2-181 and 47-3-181.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 504, § 1(1)/HB 144 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective May 11, 2011.

47-2-318.
Membership in the retirement system of officers and employees of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority; creditable service; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Georgia Environmental Finance Authority” or “authority” means the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority established by Article 1 of Chapter 23 of Title 50, known as the “Georgia Environmental Finance Authority Act.”

“Officer or employee” means the executive director of the authority and any other full-time employee of the authority employed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of Code Section 50-23-5.

“Proof of prior employment” means pay records, income tax withholding records, or other records of the authority or its predecessor agency which are sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the board of trustees the prior employment record of an officer or employee of the authority.

“Predecessor agency” means the Georgia Development Authority provided for by Chapter 10 of Title 50.

Effective July 1, 1988, or on the date of employment, each officer or employee of the authority shall become a member of the retirement system.

This subsection shall apply only to an officer or employee of the authority holding office or employed on July 1, 1988, who, prior to becoming such an officer or employee or an officer or employee of the predecessor agency, had 11 or more years of creditable service under the retirement system for which contributions to the retirement system have not been withdrawn.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority or its predecessor agency, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Any such officer or employee must pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions, plus accrued regular interest thereon, which would have been paid during the period of prior employment if the officer or employee had been a member of the retirement system during such period. The authority shall be authorized to pay from any funds available to the authority the employer contributions, plus accrued regular interest thereon, which would have been paid during such period of prior employment. For a member claiming creditable service for prior employment under this subsection, the board of trustees shall determine the period of time that the payments to the board of trustees provided for under this subsection will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled.

The authority shall be authorized to supplement, if necessary, the payments made to the board of trustees under paragraph (2) of this subsection in an amount, as determined by the board of trustees, which will fully fund as creditable service the total amount of prior employment of the officer or employee without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. If such supplement is paid to the board of trustees by the authority, the officer or employee shall receive full creditable service under the retirement system for all prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall have the same membership status under the retirement system which the person had during the person’s previous service as a member of the retirement system. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the right of an officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection to retain or reestablish creditable service for previous service as a member of the retirement system.

Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 1988, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 1988, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, an officer or employee of the authority becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-318

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1490, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 197, § 1/HB 320.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Georgia Environmental Finance Authority” for “Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority” three times in paragraph (a)(1) and at the end of the first sentence of subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 197, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2010; however, this Act shall only become effective on July 1, 2010, upon the passing of an Act to change the name of the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority to the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority.
If such Act is not passed, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2010.” Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1, which provided for the name change, became effective July 1, 2010.

47-2-319.
[Reserved] Membership in the retirement system of officers and employees of the Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Authority; contributions.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 36, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-2-319

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 527, § 2.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-320.
Membership in retirement system of officers and employees of GeorgiaNet Authority; creditable service; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“GeorgiaNet Authority” or “authority” means the GeorgiaNet Authority established by Chapter 25 of Title 50.

“Officer or employee” means the executive director of the authority and any other full-time employee of the authority employed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 50-25-2.

“Proof of prior employment” means pay records, income tax withholding records, or other records of the authority which are sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the board of trustees the prior employment record of an officer or employee of the authority.

Effective July 1, 1992, or on the date of employment, each officer or employee of the authority shall become a member of the retirement system.

This subsection shall apply only to an officer or employee of the authority holding office or employed on July 1, 1992, who, prior to becoming such an officer or employee was a member of the retirement system and whose contributions to the retirement system have not been withdrawn.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Any such officer or employee must pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions which would have been paid during the period of prior employment if the officer or employee had been a member of the retirement system during such period. The authority shall be authorized to pay from any funds available to the authority the employer contributions which would have been paid during such period of prior employment. For a member claiming creditable service for prior employment under this subsection, the board of trustees shall determine the period of time that the payments to the board of trustees provided for under this subsection will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled.

The authority shall be authorized to supplement, if necessary, the payments made to the board of trustees under paragraph (2) of this subsection in an amount, as determined by the board of trustees, which will fully fund as creditable service the total amount of prior employment of the officer or employee without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. If such supplement is paid to the board of trustees by the authority, the officer or employee shall receive full creditable service under the retirement system for all prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall have the same membership status under the retirement system which the person had during the person’s previous service as a member of the retirement system. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the right of an officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection to retain or reestablish creditable service for previous service as a member of the retirement system.

Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 1992, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 1992, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, an officer or employee of the authority becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the GeorgiaNet Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-320

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2117, § 1.

47-2-321.
Membership in the retirement system of officers and employees of the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority; creditable service; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority” or “authority” means the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority established by Part 3 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 12.

“Officer or employee” means the executive director of the authority and any other full-time employee of the authority employed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (3) of Code Section 12-3-314.

“Proof of prior employment” means pay records, income tax withholding records, or other records of the authority which are sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the board of trustees the prior employment record of an officer or employee of the authority.

Effective July 1, 1994, or on the date of employment, each officer or employee of the authority shall become a member of the retirement system.

This subsection shall apply only to an officer or employee of the authority holding office or employed on July 1, 1994.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Any such officer or employee must pay to the board of trustees no later than October 1, 1994, the employee contributions which would have been paid during the period of prior employment if the officer or employee had been a member of the retirement system during such period together with regular interest thereon. The authority shall be authorized to pay from any funds available to the authority the employer contributions which would have been paid during such period of prior employment. For a member claiming creditable service for prior employment under this subsection, the board of trustees shall determine the period of time that the payments to the board of trustees provided for under this subsection will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled.

An officer or employee shall have the option to transfer all or a portion of his or her vested interest in the pension plan maintained by the authority prior to July 1, 1994, to satisfy all or a portion of the cost to receive creditable service allowed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. Any funds transferred pursuant to such option shall be credited to the officer’s or employee’s annuity account established by the retirement system. The authority shall be authorized, but not required, to supplement such amount so transferred. The officer or employee shall receive such creditable service as the combination of funds transferred or paid for or on behalf of the employee would warrant without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system, up to the maximum amount of creditable service allowed by paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 1994, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 1994, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, an officer or employee of the authority becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-321

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 396, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 396, § 1, Ga. L. 1994, p. 715, § 1, and Ga. L. 1994, p. 718, § 1 all enacted a Code Section 47-2-321. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code sections enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 715, § 1 and Ga. L. 1994, p. 718, § 1 were renumbered as Code Sections 47-2-322 and 47-2-323, respectively.